Hawaii statutes.
[§346-368] Abuse of assistance. (a) The
provider agency operating and managing a homeless facility or any other program
for the homeless authorized by this part, or the department operating and
managing its own homeless facility, shall be responsible for determining
whether a participant is no longer eligible for shelter or other services at
the homeless facility or for any other program for the homeless, pursuant to
standards and criteria established by rule.

(b) Pursuant to rule and the right of due
process, the department or its designee, or provider agencies together with the
department, may act to bar homeless families or individuals from participating
further in any homeless facility or services, may issue a writ of possession,
and take other actions as provided by rule.

The enforcement of a writ of possession shall
be effected either by an officer appointed by the department, who shall have
all of the powers of a police officer for all action in connection with the
enforcement of the writ, or any other law enforcement officer of the State or
any county, whose duty it shall be to enforce the writ. The person enforcing
the writ shall remove all persons from the premises and put the department or
its designee, or the provider agency designated by the department, in full
possession thereof.

Upon eviction, the household goods and personal
effects of the person against whom the writ is entered, and those of any
persons using the premises incident to the person's holding, may be removed
from the premises immediately and sold or otherwise disposed of by the department
or its designee or the provider agency. The department or its designee or the
provider agency shall have a lien on the property so removed for the expenses
incurred in moving the property.

(c) Any person who enters or remains
unlawfully in or upon the premises or living quarters of any homeless facility
or any other program for the homeless authorized by this part, after reasonable
warning or request to leave by that provider agency's agents, the department or
its designee, or a police officer, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor; provided
that the offense in this subsection shall be in addition to any other
applicable offense in the Hawaii Penal Code. A warning or request shall only
be issued if the person has engaged in unlawful conduct or has violated house
rules and regulations. The house rules shall be reasonable and a copy shall be
provided to each tenant or participant. The warning or request shall supersede
any invitation by a tenant or participant at the shelter, facility, or program
to that person to visit the premises or living quarters. [L 2010, c 89, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next